tr: DJ yazılım uyumluluğu: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktör; Virtual DJ; Diğer
fr: Compatibilité du logiciel de DJ: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Autre
cs: Kompatibilita DJ softwaru: Rekordbox; DJ Serato; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Jiné
nl: Compatibiliteit DJ-software: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Andere
sv: Kompatibilitet DJ-programvara: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Övrigt
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost s DJ softverom: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Ostalo
sl-SI: Združljivost DJ-programske opreme: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Drugo
sk-SK: Kompatibilita DJ softvéru: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Iné
ro-RO: Compatibilitate software DJ: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Altele
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของซอฟต์แวร์ดีเจ: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; อื่นๆ
ru: Совместимое ПО для диджеинга: Рекордбокс; Serato DJ; Трактор; Виртуальный диджей; Другой
pl: Zgodność oprogramowania DJ-skiego: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Inne
pt-BR: Compatibilidade de software de DJ: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Outro
es: Compatibilidad del software de DJ: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Otros
fi: DJ-ohjelmistojen yhteensopivuus: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Muu
el: Συμβατότητα λογισμικού DJ: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Άλλο
vi: Khả năng tương thích phần mềm DJ: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Khác
pt-PT: Compatibilidade do software de DJ: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Outro
da: DJ-softwarekompatibilitet: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Andet
lt-LT: Didžėjaus programinės įrangos suderinamumas: „Rekordbox“; „Serato DJ“; „Traktor“; „Virtual DJ“; Kita
en: DJ software compatibility: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Other
nb: DJ-programvarekompatibilitet: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Annet
ja: DJソフトウェアの互換性: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; その他
zh-CN: DJ 软件兼容性: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; 其他
de: Kompatibilität mit DJ-Software: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Sonstiges
zh-TW: DJ 軟體相容性: 唱片盒; Serato DJ; 曳引機; 虛擬 DJ; 其他
it: Compatibilità con il software DJ: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Trattore; Virtual DJ; Altro
hu: DJ-szoftver kompatibilitása: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Virtual DJ; Egyéb
bg-BG: Съвместимост на DJ софтуера: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; Виртуален DJ; Други
ko: DJ 소프트웨어 호환성: Rekordbox; Serato DJ; Traktor; 가상 DJ; 기타